Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,135
Construction of sections.

Nothing in sections 85-1,131 to 85-1,137 shall be construed to make a person a professional athlete.

Laws 2003, LB 688, § 5.
For the operative date for this section, see section 85-1,136.